pt-BR/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/pt-BR.aff
SFX C Y 98
SFX C   ir              es/PL           quir
SFX C   ir              e/PL            quir
SFX C   ir              imos/PL         quir
SFX C   ir              is/PL           quir
SFX C   ir              em/PL           quir
SFX C   ir              ia/PL           quir
SFX C   ir              ias/PL          quir
SFX C   ir              íamos/PL        quir
SFX C   ir              íeis/PL         quir
SFX C   ir              iam/PL          quir
SFX C   ir              i/PL            quir
SFX C   ir              iste/PL         quir
SFX C   ir              iu/PL           quir
SFX C   ir              istes/PL        quir
SFX C   ir              iram/PL         quir
SFX C   ir              ira/PL          quir
SFX C   ir              iras/PL         quir
SFX C   ir              íramos/PL       quir
SFX C   ir              íreis/PL        quir
SFX C   ir              irei/PL         quir
SFX C   ir              irás/PL         quir
SFX C   ir              irá/PL          quir
SFX C   ir              iremos/PL       quir
SFX C   ir              ireis/PL        quir
SFX C   ir              irão/PL         quir
SFX C   ir              iria/PL         quir
SFX C   ir              irias/PL        quir
SFX C   ir              iríamos/PL      quir
SFX C   ir              iríeis/PL       quir
SFX C   ir              iriam/PL        quir
SFX C   ir              isse/PL         quir
SFX C   ir              isses/PL        quir
SFX C   ir              íssemos/PL      quir
SFX C   ir              ísseis/PL       quir
SFX C   ir              issem/PL        quir
SFX C   ir              ires/PL         quir
SFX C   ir              irmos/PL        quir
SFX C   ir              irdes/PL        quir
SFX C   ir              irem/PL         quir
SFX C   ir              indo/PL         quir
SFX C   ir              ido/PL          quir
SFX C   ir              idos/PL         quir
SFX C   ir              ida/PL          quir
SFX C   ir              idas/PL         quir
SFX C   ir              o/PL            truir
SFX C   uir             óis/PL          truir
SFX C   ir              is/PL           truir
SFX C   uir             ói/PL           truir
SFX C   ir              i/PL            truir
SFX C   ir              ímos/PL         truir
SFX C   ir              ís/PL           truir
SFX C   uir             oem/PL          truir
SFX C   uir             uem/PL          truir
SFX C   ir              í/PL            truir
SFX C   ir              íste/PL         truir
SFX C   ir              iu/PL           truir
SFX C   ir              ístes/PL        truir
SFX C   ir              íram/PL         truir
SFX C   ir              ía/PL           truir
SFX C   ir              ías/PL          truir
SFX C   ir              íamos/PL        truir
SFX C   ir              íeis/PL         truir
SFX C   ir              íam/PL          truir
SFX C   ir              íra/PL          truir
SFX C   ir              íras/PL         truir
SFX C   ir              íramos/PL       truir
SFX C   ir              íreis/PL        truir
SFX C   ir              irei/PL         truir
SFX C   ir              irás/PL         truir
SFX C   ir              irá/PL          truir
SFX C   ir              iremos/PL       truir
SFX C   ir              ireis/PL        truir
SFX C   ir              irão/PL         truir
SFX C   ir              iria/PL         truir
SFX C   ir              irias/PL        truir
SFX C   ir              iríamos/PL      truir
SFX C   ir              iríeis/PL       truir
SFX C   ir              iriam/PL        truir
SFX C   ir              a/PL            truir
SFX C   ir              as/PL           truir
SFX C   ir              amos/PL         truir
SFX C   ir              ais/PL          truir
SFX C   ir              am/PL           truir
SFX C   ir              ísse/PL         truir
SFX C   ir              ísses/PL        truir
SFX C   ir              íssemos/PL      truir
SFX C   ir              ísseis/PL       truir
SFX C   ir              íssem/PL        truir
SFX C   ir              íres/PL         truir
SFX C   ir              irmos/PL        truir
SFX C   ir              irdes/PL        truir
SFX C   ir              írem/PL         truir
SFX C   ir              uí/PL           truir
SFX C   ir              ído/PL          truir
SFX C   ir              ídos/PL         truir
SFX C   ir              ída/PL          truir
SFX C   ir              ídas/PL         truir
SFX C   ir              indo/PL         truir
